Massachusetts, session 194th, H164.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 3 of Chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in paragraph (3) of subsection (d) by inserting at the end
thereof the following new sentence:- “The commission may extend the expiration date of a
license until such time as it certifies the host community agreement is compliant.”
Section 2. Section 3 of Chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (d) by inserting the following new paragraph:-
(7) The requirements of this section shall apply to all host community agreements for
marijuana establishments or medical marijuana treatment centers seeking a license or currently
holding a license to operate within the Commonwealth, including those executed prior to the
effective date of Chapter 180 of the Acts of 2022.
of 1